North Dakota statutes. TITLE 48 Public Buildings
CHAPTER 48-08 Restrictions on Use of Public Buildings

48-08-01.
Rental of hall and provision of funds by taxation.

The city council or board of city commissioners of any city, the board of supervisors of any township, or the school board of any school district, in this chapter designated as the governing board, may pay the rental of any hall or auditorium, when it is used in such municipality for any public meeting or purpose and no charge is made for admission, and annually may provide by taxation a sum sufficient to defray any such expense for rental as may be anticipated for the coming year. This section does not apply to any city where there exists a public hall owned by the municipality suitable for the purpose.

Source:

S.L. 1915, ch. 165, § 1; 1925 Supp., § 1838b1; R.C. 1943, § 48-0801.

Collateral References.

Granting or taking of lease of property by municipality as within authorization of purchase or acquisition thereof, 11 A.L.R.2d 168.

48-08-02.
May pay rental out of other funds until tax available.

Until such funds as are provided by section 48-08-01 shall become available, any such governing board shall pay out of funds on hand not otherwise appropriated or required such sums as may be deemed a fair rental for any hall or auditorium when used for a public meeting.

Source:

S.L. 1915, ch. 165, § 2; 1925 Supp., § 1838b2; R.C. 1943, § 48-0802.

48-08-02.1.
Designation of memorial hall.

The area on the first floor of the state capitol from the legislative assembly hall on the west, past the double stairway, to the brass columns on the east, is designated as memorial hall.

Source:

S.L. 2017, ch. 324, § 1, effective August 1, 2017.

48-08-03.
Media room in state capitol.

The director of the office of management and budget shall set aside a room in the state capitol for the exclusive use of the media and shall place the North Dakota newspaper association and North Dakota broadcasters association jointly in charge of the room.

Source:

S.L. 1935, ch. 266, §§ 1, 2; R.C. 1943, § 48-0803; S.L. 1991, ch. 592, § 21; 2021, ch. 339, § 1, effective March 10, 2021.

48-08-04.
Use of legislative assembly rooms and halls.

During the interim between legislative sessions, the committee rooms, halls, passageways, and other space in the capitol used by the legislative assembly, including the pioneer room, the coteau room, the Sheyenne River room, judicial wing room 216, and judicial wing rooms 327 B, C, and E, may not be used without authorization of the legislative council.

Source:

Sen. Res. “J,” S.L. 1941, p. 602; R.C. 1943, § 48-0804; S.L. 1989, ch. 564, § 1; 2009, ch. 482, § 32; 2015, ch. 49, § 26, effective July 1, 2015; 2021, 1st Sp. Sess. ch. 561, § 1, effective December 1, 2021.

Effective Date.

The 2015 amendment of this section by section 26 of chapter 49, S.L. 2015 became effective July 1, 2015.

48-08-05.
Federal agencies charged for light, heat, and janitor service.

The director of the office of management and budget shall fix and determine a fair and reasonable monthly charge for light, heat, and janitor service to be paid by each federal agency located and transacting business in the capitol.

Source:

Sen. Res. “J,” S.L. 1941, p. 602; R.C. 1943, § 48-0805; S.L. 1991, ch. 592, § 22.

48-08-06.
Lease of public buildings — Authorized.

The governing body of any county, city, or township may permit the use of or may lease any public building or any part of a public building under its charge for any legal purpose, giving equal opportunity to all persons, and without religious or political distinctions, and may make such reasonable rules and restrictions on the use of such building as may seem necessary, and shall fix proper rentals and fees for such use. Such governing body, in its discretion, may require a bond from the lessee or user of such building, conditioned upon the payment of charges made for such lease or use and indemnifying the county, city, or township against damage or destruction of or to such building or any part thereof.

Source:

S.L. 1943, ch. 199, § 1; R.C. 1943, § 48-0806.

Collateral References.

Public utility plant or interest therein, power of municipality to sell, lease or mortgage, 61 A.L.R.2d 595.

School property, use for other than public school or religious purposes, 94 A.L.R.2d 1274.

Power of municipal corporation to lease or sublet property owned or leased by it, 47 A.L.R.3d 19.

48-08-07.
Lease of public buildings — Terms.

No lease of any public building or part of any public building under the provisions of section 48-08-06 may be for a longer term than two years, except as may be otherwise provided by city ordinance or by resolution of the board of county commissioners. Such lease must be to a responsible party offering the highest return to the political subdivision and the use or occupation of the building may not interfere with the use of such building for public purposes. The governing body may reserve the right to reject any and all bids.

Source:

S.L. 1943, ch. 199, § 2; R.C. 1943, § 48-0807; S.L. 1985, ch. 512, § 1; 1993, ch. 461, § 1.

48-08-08.
State, county, or local municipal buildings — Space for disaster activities.

The director of the office of management and budget and any other group, board, or commission having control of the use of any state, county, or local municipal buildings are authorized to provide space for emergency operating centers and disaster offices in such buildings.

Source:

S.L. 1965, ch. 317, § 1; 1991, ch. 592, § 23.